Indiana, session 2026, SB152.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 8-1-2-46, AS AMENDED BY P.L.233-2017,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 46. (a) The commission shall provide for a
comprehensive classification of such service for each public utility and
such classification may take into account the quantity used, the time
when used, the purpose for which used and other reasonable
consideration. Each public utility is required to conform its schedules
of rates, tolls, and charges to such classification.
(b) As used in this section, "energy utility" means:
(1) a public utility, as defined in section 1(a) of this chapter;
(2) a municipally owned utility, as defined in section 1(h) of
this chapter;
(3) a cooperatively owned utility; or
(4) a not-for-profit utility, including a utility company owned,
operated, or held in trust by a consolidated city;
that provides electric utility service, gas utility service, or both
electric utility service and gas utility service to the public.
2026 IN 152—LS 6487/DI 119


(c) As used in this section, "utility" means:
(1) an energy utility; or
(2) a water or wastewater utility.
(b) (d) As used in this section, "water or wastewater utility" means:
(1) a public utility, as defined in section 1(a) of this chapter;
(2) a municipally owned utility, as defined in section 1(h) of this
chapter; or
(3) a not-for-profit utility, as defined in section 125(a) of this
chapter;
that provides water or wastewater service to the public.
(c) (e) Upon request by a water or wastewater utility in a general
rate case, the commission may allow, but may not require, a water or
wastewater utility to establish a customer assistance program that:
(1) uses state or federal infrastructure funds, as applicable; or
(2) provides financial relief to residential customers who qualify
for income related assistance.
A customer assistance program established under this subsection that
affects rates and charges for service is not discriminatory for purposes
of this chapter or any other law regulating rates and charges for service.
In considering whether to approve a water or wastewater utility's
proposed customer assistance program, the commission shall determine
that a customer assistance program established under this subsection
furthers the interests set forth in section 0.5 of this chapter and is in the
public interest.
(d) (f) The commission shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this section.
SECTION 2. IC 8-1-2-83, AS AMENDED BY P.L.136-2018,
SECTION 49, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 83. (a) This section does not apply to:
(1) a corporation organized or operating under IC 8-1-13; or
(2) a corporation organized under IC 23-17, some of the
members of which are local district corporations (as defined
in IC 8-1-13-23(b)).
(b) As used in this section, "control" means the power to direct
the management and policies of a public utility, utility company, or
utility holding company through:
(1) the ownership of voting securities or stock;
(2) the terms of a contract; or
(3) other means.
The term does not include power from holding an official position
or corporate office with the public utility, utility company, or
utility holding company. Control is presumed to exist if a person,
2026 IN 152—LS 6487/DI 119


directly or indirectly, owns, controls, has the power to vote, or has
the power to vote proxies that constitute at least ten percent (10%)
of the total voting power of the public utility, utility company, or
utility holding company.
(c) As used in this section, "person" means an individual, a firm,
a corporation, a company, a partnership, a limited liability
company, an association, a trustee, a lessee, or a receiver.
(d) As used in this section, "reorganization" means a
transaction that, regardless of the means by which the transaction
is accomplished, results in:
(1) a change in the ownership of a majority of the voting
capital stock of a public utility;
(2) a change in the ownership or control of an entity that owns
or controls a majority of the voting capital stock of a public
utility;
(3) the merger of two (2) public utilities; or
(4) the acquisition by one (1) public utility of substantially all
assets of another public utility.
(e) As used in this section, "utility company" has the same
meaning as the definition of "public utility" under section 1 of this
chapter, except that a utility company owns, operates, manages, or
controls a plant or equipment located outside Indiana.
(f) As used in this section, unless otherwise indicated, "utility
holding company" means a company that has control over one (1)
or more:
(1) public utilities; or
(2) utility companies.
(a) (g) No A public utility as defined in section 1 of this chapter,
shall may not do any of the following without the approval of the
commission after a hearing:
(1) Sell, assign, transfer, lease, or encumber its the public
utility's stock, franchise, works, or system to any other person,
partnership, limited liability company, or corporation. or
(2) Contract for the operation of any part of its the public utility's
works or system by any other person, partnership, limited liability
company, or corporation. without the approval of the commission
after hearing. And no such
(3) Contract for or effect a reorganization of the public utility.
(4) Acquire control, directly or indirectly, of a public utility,
utility company, or utility holding company.
(h) A person may not acquire control, directly or indirectly, of:
(1) a public utility; or
2026 IN 152—LS 6487/DI 119


(2) a utility holding company that has control over a public
utility;
without the approval of the commission after a hearing.
(i) A utility holding company that has control over at least one
(1) public utility may not acquire control of a utility company
without the approval of the commission after a hearing.
(j) If a public utility requests commission approval of the sale,
assignment, or transfer of the public utility's franchise, works, or
system under subsection (g), the commission shall grant a right of
first refusal to:
(1) a municipality in which the public utility's works or system
is located; or
(2) a public charitable trust;
for the purchase or acquisition of the public utility's franchise,
works, or system.
(k) A public utility, except temporarily or in case of emergency and
for a period of not exceeding thirty (30) days, shall may not make any
special contract at rates, other than those prescribed in its the public
utility's schedule of rates theretofore filed with the commission and in
force, with any other utility for rendering any service to or procuring
any service from such other utility, without the approval of the
commission. It shall be lawful, however, for any a public utility to
make a contract for service to or from another utility at rates previously
filed with and approved by the commission and in force.
(b) (l) The approval of the commission of the sale, assignment,
transfer, lease, or encumbrance of a franchise or any part of a franchise
under this section shall not revive or validate any lapsed or invalid
franchise, or enlarge or add to the powers and privileges contained in
the grant of any franchise or waive any forfeiture. No such A public
utility shall may not directly or indirectly purchase, acquire, or become
the owner of any of the property, stock, or bonds of any other public
utility authorized to engage or engaged in the same or a similar
business, or operating or purporting to operate under a franchise from
the same or any other municipality or under an indeterminate permit
unless authorized so to do by the commission.
(c) (m) Nothing contained in this section shall prevent the holding
of stock lawfully acquired before May 1, 1913, or prohibit, upon the
surrender or exchange of said stock pursuant to a reorganization plan,
the purchase, acquisition, taking, or holding by the owner of a
proportionate amount of the stock of any new corporation organized to
take over at foreclosure or other sale, the property of the corporation
whose stock has been thus surrendered or exchanged.
2026 IN 152—LS 6487/DI 119


(d) (n) Every A contract by any a public utility for the purchase,
acquisition, assignment, or transfer to it the public utility of any of the
stock of any other public utility by or through any person, partnership,
limited liability company, or corporation without the approval of the
commission shall be void and of no effect, and no such transfer or
assignment of such stock upon the books of the corporation pursuant
to any such contract shall be effective for any purpose.
SECTION 3. IC 8-1-2-84, AS AMENDED BY P.L.11-2023,
SECTION 34, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 84. (a) With the consent and approval of the
commission and with the authority of their stockholders as provided in
this chapter, but not otherwise, any two (2) or more public utilities
furnishing a like service or product and doing business in the same
municipality or locality within Indiana, or any two (2) or more public
utilities whose lines intersect or parallel each other within Indiana, may
be merged and may enter into contracts with each other which will
enable such public utilities to operate their plants or lines in connection
with each other. Before any merger shall become effective there shall
be filed with the commission proof that the voting stockholders have
authorized or consented to such merger. If the law under which the
company is incorporated or reorganized so provides, then the
authorization and consent of the holders of the majority of the voting
stock shall be shown. In all other cases the consent of the holders of
three-fourths (3/4) of the outstanding voting stock of the company shall
be shown. Such authority and consent may be shown by filing with the
commission a certified copy of the minutes of a stockholders' meeting
or by filing with the commission a written consent of such holders or
both. In case of such merger, union, or consolidation, dissenting
stockholders shall apply to the commission within sixty (60) days after
approval by the commission to have the value of their stock assessed
and determined. Stockholders not so applying shall be held to have
assented. Upon the determination of the value of the stock of such
dissenting stockholder, the corporation in which they are stockholders
may within sixty (60) days pay the dissenting stockholders for their
stock the appraised value thereof, or may elect to abandon the merger,
union, or consolidation by filing with the commission notice of such
election.
(b) It shall not be necessary for any public utility merging, uniting,
or consolidating to comply with such provisions of any law governing
the procedure in the merger, union, or consolidation of corporations as
are in conflict with the provisions of this chapter. This chapter shall not
create any new right of merger or enlarge any such right but is intended
2026 IN 152—LS 6487/DI 119


only to prescribe and simplify the proceedings in mergers which are
authorized by other statutes.
(c) Any such Subject to section 83(j) of this chapter, a public
utility may purchase or lease the used and useful property, plant, or
business, or any part thereof, of any other such public utility at a price
and on terms approved by the commission. Whenever, in the case of
any such purchase, the amount to be paid by the purchaser for the
property, plant, or business to be purchased shall be an amount in
excess of five percent (5%) of the book cost to the purchaser of all the
properties, plants, and business owned by it at the time application is
made to the commission for approval of such purchase, or whenever,
in the case of any such lease, the book cost to the lessor of the property,
plant, or business to be leased shall be an amount in excess of five
percent (5%) of the book cost to the lessee of all the properties, plants,
and business owned by the lessee at the time application is made to the
commission for approval of such lease, there shall be obtained from the
holders of three-fourths (3/4) of the voting stock of such purchaser or
lessee their consent, authority, and approval to such purchase or lease.
(d) Any such public utility may purchase or lease the used and
useful property, plant, or business, or any part thereof, of a municipally
owned utility, as used in this chapter, owned or operated by a city
having a population of more than one hundred fifty thousand (150,000)
and less than five hundred thousand (500,000), with the approval of the
commission at a price or rental and on terms approved by the
commission.
(e) Any such Subject to section 83(j) of this chapter, a public
utility may sell or lease its used or useful property, plant, or business,
or any part thereof, to any other such public utility at a price and on
terms approved by the commission. Whenever in the case of any such
sale or lease the book cost to the seller or lessor of such property, plant,
or business to be sold or leased shall be an amount in excess of five
percent (5%) of the book cost to such seller or lessor of all the
properties, plants, and business owned by it at the time application is
made to the commission for approval of such sale or lease, there shall
be obtained from the holders of three-fourths (3/4) of the voting stock
of such seller or lessor their consent, authority, and approval to such
sale or lease. Whenever in the case of any such sale or lease the book
cost to the seller or lessor of such property, plant, or business to be sold
or leased shall be an amount in excess of twenty percent (20%) of the
book cost to such seller or lessor of all the properties, plants, and
business owned by it at the time application is made to the commission
for approval of such sale or lease, dissenting stockholders of such seller
2026 IN 152—LS 6487/DI 119


or lessor shall, if the sale or lease is consummated, be paid for their
stock the appraised value thereof as determined by the commission.
Dissenting stockholders in such a case shall, within sixty (60) days
after publication of notice of the approval by the commission of such
sale or lease, apply to the commission to have the value of their stock
assessed and determined. Stockholders not so applying shall be held to
have assented. Such publication of notice shall be given by the seller
or lessor to its stockholders by publishing such notice once each week
for three (3) successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation
printed in the English language and published in Marion County,
Indiana. Upon determination of the value of the stock of such
dissenting stockholders such seller or lessor may within sixty (60) days
either pay the dissenting stockholders for their stock the appraised
value thereof or elect to abandon the sale or lease by filing with the
commission notice of its election to abandon.
(f) No such public utility shall encumber its used and useful
property or business or any part thereof without the approval of the
commission and the consent, authority, and approval of the owners of
three-fourths (3/4) of its voting stock.
(g) Any public utility corporation upon the order of a majority of its
board of directors and with the approval of the commission may
acquire, purchase or lease any real or personal estate or other property
of any other public utility not used and useful in the public service of
such other public utility.
(h) Any public utility corporation, upon the order of a majority of its
board of directors and with the approval of the commission, may sell
and convey or lease to any other public utility corporation any of its
real or personal estate or other property not used and useful in its
public service.
SECTION 4. IC 8-1-10.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 10.5. Energy Utility Transparency and Reporting
Sec. 1. (a) As used in this chapter, "affiliate", with regard to an
energy utility, means any person who directly or indirectly:
(1) controls;
(2) is controlled by; or
(3) is under the common control of;
the energy utility.
(b) The term includes a parent company or a subsidiary.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "energy utility" means a public
utility (as defined in IC 8-1-2-1(a)) that:
2026 IN 152—LS 6487/DI 119


(1) provides retail:
(A) electric; or
(B) natural gas;
service to the public; and
(2) is under the jurisdiction of the commission for the
approval of rates and charges.
Sec. 3. (a) The commission may not authorize an energy utility
to recover through the energy utility's retail rates and charges any
direct or indirect costs associated with the following:
(1) Membership dues, sponsorship fees, or monetary
contributions paid to:
(A) a business or industry trade group or association; or
(B) a not-for-profit affiliate of the energy utility.
(2) Lobbying, legislative action, or other political activities,
including research, analysis, preparation, planning, or other
activities undertaken in support of lobbying or legislative
action.
(3) Advertising, marketing, or communications undertaken to
influence public opinion.
(4) Travel, lodging, or food and beverage expenses for:
(A) the energy utility's officers or board of directors; or
(B) the officers or board of directors of an affiliate of the
energy utility.
(5) Entertainment or gifts.
(6) Leasing, owning, or chartering an aircraft for use by:
(A) the energy utility's officers or board of directors; or
(B) the officers or board of directors of an affiliate of the
energy utility.
(7) Charitable giving, including contributions to any
not-for-profit organization exempt from federal income
taxation under Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(4) of the Internal
Revenue Code, and any expenses related to charitable giving.
(8) Compensation paid to an employee, if any portion of the
employee's time in a given year is spent on lobbying,
legislative action, or other political activities.
(9) Compensation paid to an employee, if any portion of the
employee's time in a given year is spent litigating or appealing
legislation or commission rulings.
(10) Litigation regarding existing or proposed statutes,
regulations, ordinances, or legislation at the federal, state, or
local level.
(11) Any expenses related to:
2026 IN 152—LS 6487/DI 119


(A) products;
(B) services; or
(C) programs;
that are not regulated by the commission, including any
marketing, administrative, or customer service related
expenses for such products, services, or programs.
(12) Investor relations.
(b) Beginning in 2026, an energy utility shall file with the
commission, at the time and in the form and manner prescribed by
the commission, an annual report that includes the following
information concerning each activity or expense described in
subsection (a):
(1) For each expense or activity described in subsection (a),
the total costs to:
(A) the energy utility; or
(B) an affiliate of the energy utility;
that are directly billed or allocated to the energy utility. The
amounts reported under this subdivision must be separately
delineated for each expense or activity described in subsection
(a).
(2) The job title, job description, and salary of any employee
of the energy utility who performed work associated with the
activities described in subsection (a)(2), (a)(3), (a)(8), (a)(9),
(a)(10), (a)(11), or (a)(12) for the energy utility, along with the
number of hours attributable to such work by the employee.
(3) The job title, job description, and salary of any employee
of an affiliate of the energy utility who performed work
associated with the activities described in subsection (a)(2),
(a)(3), (a)(8), (a)(9), (a)(10), (a)(11), or (a)(12), along with the
number of hours attributable to such work by the employee,
to the extent that the costs associated with the work are
directly billed or allocated to the energy utility.
(4) An itemized list of the amounts billed or allocated to the
energy utility by third party vendors for any expenses or
activities described in subsection (a), including unredacted
billing amounts, billing dates, payees, and explanations of
each expenditure in sufficient detail to indicate the
expenditure's purpose, including, if applicable, all Federal
Energy Regulatory Commission Uniform System of Accounts
codes for which payment to the vendor was recorded.
(5) A list of all divisions, departments, or other organizational
groups within the energy utility that performed any activities
2026 IN 152—LS 6487/DI 119


described in subsection (a). For each division, department, or
group identified, the energy utility shall include a list of the
employees who work in the division, department, or group.
For each employee listed, the energy utility shall provide the
following information:
(A) The employee's job title.
(B) A job description sufficient to describe the employee's
responsibilities.
(C) An identification of each activity described in
subsection (a) in which the employee engages, including a
description sufficient to describe the nature of each
activity.
(D) The employee's total annual compensation and the
percentage of that compensation paid for work associated
with activities described in subsection (a), including, if
applicable, all Federal Energy Regulatory Commission
Uniform System of Accounts codes for which payment to
the employee was recorded.
(c) The commission shall make available on the commission's
website a direct link to the annual reports provided by energy
utilities under this section, subject to the commission's duty to
redact or exclude any information that the commission is
prohibited from disclosing under state or federal law.
Sec. 4. (a) On any customer bill issued by an energy utility after
December 31, 2026, the energy utility must include a break down
of the charges and fees that make up the total amount owed for the
billing cycle, including a description of the service or cost
associated with each charge or fee, if not apparent on its face. To
the extent applicable, the following must be delineated as specific
line items on each customer bill:
(1) Distribution and delivery charges.
(2) Generation and supply charges, including the cost per unit
consumed.
(3) Individual program charges, separately stated for each
program for which the customer is charged, including energy
efficiency programs, low income assistance programs,
demand response programs, and any other programs outside
the provision of basic service.
(4) Account or program credits.
(5) Taxes.
(6) Account management and billing fees.
(7) Any other applicable charges or fees.
2026 IN 152—LS 6487/DI 119


(b) An energy utility shall take appropriate internal operational
measures to separate the energy utility's costs so as to accurately
reflect those costs in associated charges and fees charged to
customers and itemized in customer bills under subsection (a).
SECTION 5. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 152—LS 6487/DI 119